Illinois, session 104th, SB4025.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 17.12 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/17.12)7    Sec. 17.12. Lead service line replacement and 8notification.9    (a) The purpose of this Act is to: (1) require the owners 10and operators of community water supplies to develop, 11implement, and maintain a comprehensive water service line 12material inventory and a comprehensive lead service line 13replacement plan, provide notice to occupants of potentially 14affected buildings before any construction or repair work on 15water mains or lead service lines, and request access to 16potentially affected buildings before replacing lead service 17lines; and (2) prohibit partial lead service line 18replacements, except as authorized within this Section.19    (b) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 20        (1) There is no safe level of exposure to heavy metal 21    lead, as found by the United States Environmental 22    Protection Agency and the Centers for Disease Control and 23    Prevention.  SB4025 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        (2) Lead service lines can convey this harmful 2    substance to the drinking water supply.3        (3) According to the Illinois Environmental Protection 4    Agency's 2018 Service Line Material Inventory, the State 5    of Illinois is estimated to have over 680,000 lead-based 6    service lines still in operation.7        (4) The true number of lead service lines is not fully 8    known because Illinois lacks an adequate inventory of lead 9    service lines.10        (5) For the general health, safety, and welfare of its 11    residents, all lead service lines in Illinois should be 12    disconnected from the drinking water supply, and the 13    State's drinking water supply. 14    (c) In this Section:15    "Advisory Board" means the Lead Service Line Replacement 16Advisory Board created under subsection (x).17    "Community water supply" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18Section 3.145 of this Act.19    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.20    "Emergency repair" means any unscheduled water main, water 21service, or water valve repair or replacement that results 22from failure or accident.23    "Fund" means the Lead Service Line Replacement Fund 24created under subsection (bb).25    "Lead service line" means a service line made of lead or 26service line connected to a lead pigtail, lead gooseneck, or   SB4025 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1other lead fitting.2    "Material inventory" means a water service line material 3inventory developed by a community water supply under this 4Act.5    "Non-community water supply" has the meaning ascribed to 6it in Section 3.145 of the Environmental Protection Act.7    "NSF/ANSI Standard" means a water treatment standard 8developed by NSF International.9    "Partial lead service line replacement" means replacement 10of only a portion of a lead service line.11    "Potentially affected building" means any building that is 12provided water service through a service line that is either a 13lead service line or a suspected lead service line.14    "Public water supply" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15Section 3.365 of this Act.16    "Service line" means the piping, tubing, and necessary 17appurtenances acting as a conduit from the water main or 18source of potable water supply to the building plumbing at the 19first shut-off valve or 18 inches inside the building, 20whichever is shorter.21    "Suspected lead service line" means a service line that a 22community water supply finds more likely than not to be made of 23lead after completing the requirements under paragraphs (2) 24through (5) of subsection (h).25    "Small system" means a community water supply that 26regularly serves water to 3,300 or fewer persons.   SB4025 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    (d) An owner or operator of a community water supply 2shall: 3        (1) develop an initial material inventory by April 15, 4    2022 and electronically submit by April 15, 2023 an 5    updated material inventory electronically to the Agency; 6    and7        (2) deliver a complete material inventory to the 8    Agency no later than April 15, 2024, or such time as 9    required by federal law, whichever is sooner. The complete 10    inventory shall report the composition of all service 11    lines in the community water supply's distribution system. 12    (e) The Agency shall review and approve the final material 13inventory submitted to it under subsection (d).14    (f) If a community water supply does not submit a complete 15inventory to the Agency by April 15, 2024 under paragraph (2) 16of subsection (d), the community water supply may apply for an 17extension to the Agency no less than 3 months prior to the due 18date. The Agency shall develop criteria for granting material 19inventory extensions. When considering requests for extension, 20the Agency shall, at a minimum, consider: 21        (1) the number of service connections in a water 22    supply; and23        (2) the number of service lines of an unknown material 24    composition.25    (g) A material inventory prepared for a community water 26supply under subsection (d) shall identify:   SB4025 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        (1) the total number of service lines connected to the 2    community water supply's distribution system;3        (2) the materials of construction of each service line 4    connected to the community water supply's distribution 5    system;6        (3) the number of suspected lead service lines that 7    were newly identified in the material inventory for the 8    community water supply after the community water supply 9    last submitted a service line inventory to the Agency; and10        (4) the number of suspected or known lead service 11    lines that were replaced after the community water supply 12    last submitted a service line inventory to the Agency, and 13    the material of the service line that replaced each lead 14    service line. 15    When identifying the materials of construction under 16paragraph (2) of this subsection, the owner or operator of the 17community water supply shall to the best of the owner's or 18operator's ability identify the type of construction material 19used on the customer's side of the curb box, meter, or other 20line of demarcation and the community water supply's side of 21the curb box, meter, or other line of demarcation.22    (h) In completing a material inventory under subsection 23(d), the owner or operator of a community water supply shall: 24        (1) prioritize inspections of high-risk areas 25    identified by the community water supply and inspections 26    of high-risk facilities, such as preschools, day care   SB4025 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    centers, day care homes, group day care homes, parks, 2    playgrounds, hospitals, and clinics, and confirm service 3    line materials in those areas and at those facilities;4        (2) review historical documentation, such as 5    construction logs or cards, as-built drawings, purchase 6    orders, and subdivision plans, to determine service line 7    material construction;8        (3) when conducting distribution system maintenance, 9    visually inspect service lines and document materials of 10    construction;11        (4) identify any time period when the service lines 12    being connected to its distribution system were primarily 13    lead service lines, if such a time period is known or 14    suspected; and15        (5) discuss service line repair and installation with 16    its employees, contractors, plumbers, other workers who 17    worked on service lines connected to its distribution 18    system, or all of the above.19    (i) The owner or operator of each community water supply 20shall maintain records of persons who refuse to grant access 21to the interior of a building for purposes of identifying the 22materials of construction of a service line. If a community 23water supply has been denied access on the property or to the 24interior of a building for that reason, then the community 25water supply shall attempt to identify the service line as a 26suspected lead service line, unless documentation is provided   SB4025 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1showing otherwise.2    (j) If a community water supply identifies a lead service 3line connected to a building, the owner or operator of the 4community water supply shall attempt to notify the owner of 5the building and all occupants of the building of the 6existence of the lead service line within 15 days after 7identifying the lead service line, or as soon as is reasonably 8possible thereafter. Individual written notice shall be given 9according to the provisions of subsection (jj) or another 10method approved by the State.11    (k) An owner or operator of a community water supply has no 12duty to include in the material inventory required under 13subsection (d) information about service lines that are 14physically disconnected from a water main in its distribution 15system.16    (l) The owner or operator of each community water supply 17shall post on its website a copy of the most recently submitted 18material inventory or alternatively may request that the 19Agency post a copy of that material inventory on the Agency's 20website.21    (m) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 22service lines to be unearthed for the sole purpose of 23inventorying.24    (n) When an owner or operator of a community water supply 25awards a contract under this Section, the owner or operator 26shall make a good faith effort to use contractors and vendors   SB4025 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1owned by minority persons, women, and persons with a 2disability, as those terms are defined in Section 2 of the 3Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 4Disabilities Act, for not less than 20% of the total 5contracts, provided that:6        (1) contracts representing at least 11% of the total 7    projects shall be awarded to minority-owned businesses, as 8    defined in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for 9    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act;10        (2) contracts representing at least 7% of the total 11    projects shall be awarded to women-owned businesses, as 12    defined in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for 13    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act; and14        (3) contracts representing at least 2% of the total 15    projects shall be awarded to businesses owned by persons 16    with a disability.17    Owners or operators of a community water supply are 18encouraged to divide projects, whenever economically feasible, 19into contracts of smaller size that ensure small business 20contractors or vendors shall have the ability to qualify in 21the applicable bidding process, when determining the ability 22to deliver on a given contract based on scope and size, as a 23responsible and responsive bidder.24    When a contractor or vendor submits a bid or letter of 25intent in response to a request for proposal or other bid 26submission, the contractor or vendor shall include with its   SB4025 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1responsive documents a utilization plan that shall address how 2compliance with applicable good faith requirements set forth 3in this subsection shall be addressed.4    Under this subsection, "good faith effort" means a 5community water supply has taken all necessary steps to comply 6with the goals of this subsection by complying with the 7following:8        (1) Soliciting through reasonable and available means 9    the interest of a business, as defined in Section 2 of the 10    Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 11    with Disabilities Act, that have the capability to perform 12    the work of the contract. The community water supply must 13    solicit this interest within sufficient time to allow 14    certified businesses to respond.15        (2) Providing interested certified businesses with 16    adequate information about the plans, specifications, and 17    requirements of the contract, including addenda, in a 18    timely manner to assist them in responding to the 19    solicitation.20        (3) Meeting in good faith with interested certified 21    businesses that have submitted bids.22        (4) Effectively using the services of the State, 23    minority or women community organizations, minority or 24    women contractor groups, local, State, and federal 25    minority or women business assistance offices, and other 26    organizations to provide assistance in the recruitment and   SB4025 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    placement of certified businesses.2        (5) Making efforts to use appropriate forums for 3    purposes of advertising subcontracting opportunities 4    suitable for certified businesses.5    The diversity goals defined in this subsection can be met 6through direct award to diverse contractors and through the 7use of diverse subcontractors and diverse vendors to 8contracts. 9    (o) An owner or operator of a community water supply shall 10collect data necessary to ensure compliance with subsection 11(n) no less than semi-annually and shall include progress 12toward compliance of subsection (n) in the owner or operator's 13report required under subsection (t-5). The report must 14include data on vendor and employee diversity, including data 15on the owner's or operator's implementation of subsection (n).16    (p) Every owner or operator of a community water supply 17that has known or suspected lead service lines shall: 18        (1) create a plan to:19            (A) replace each lead service line connected to 20        its distribution system; and21            (B) replace each galvanized service line connected 22        to its distribution system, if the galvanized service 23        line is or was connected downstream to lead piping; 24        and25        (2) electronically submit, by April 15, 2024 its 26    initial lead service line replacement plan to the Agency;  SB4025 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        (3) electronically submit by April 15 of each year 2    after 2024 until April 15, 2027 an updated lead service 3    line replacement plan to the Agency for review; the 4    updated replacement plan shall account for changes in the 5    number of lead service lines or unknown service lines in 6    the material inventory described in subsection (d);7        (4) electronically submit by April 15, 2027 a complete 8    and final replacement plan to the Agency for approval; the 9    complete and final replacement plan shall account for all 10    known and suspected lead service lines documented in the 11    final material inventory described under paragraph (3) of 12    subsection (d); and13        (5) post on its website a copy of the plan most 14    recently submitted to the Agency or may request that the 15    Agency post a copy of that plan on the Agency's website. 16    (q) Each plan required under paragraph (1) of subsection 17(p) shall include the following: 18        (1) the name and identification number of the 19    community water supply;20        (2) the total number of service lines connected to the 21    distribution system of the community water supply;22        (3) the total number of suspected lead service lines 23    connected to the distribution system of the community 24    water supply;25        (4) the total number of known lead service lines 26    connected to the distribution system of the community   SB4025 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    water supply;2        (5) the total number of lead service lines connected 3    to the distribution system of the community water supply 4    that have been replaced each year beginning in 2020;5        (6) a proposed lead service line replacement schedule 6    that includes one-year, 5-year, 10-year, 15-year, 20-year, 7    25-year, and 30-year goals;8        (7) an analysis of costs and financing options for 9    replacing the lead service lines connected to the 10    community water supply's distribution system, which shall 11    include, but shall not be limited to: 12            (A) a detailed accounting of costs associated with 13        replacing lead service lines and galvanized lines that 14        are or were connected downstream to lead piping;15            (B) measures to address affordability and prevent 16        service shut-offs for customers or ratepayers; and17            (C) consideration of different scenarios for 18        structuring payments between the utility and its 19        customers over time; and 20        (8) a plan for prioritizing high-risk facilities, such 21    as preschools, day care centers, day care homes, group day 22    care homes, parks, playgrounds, hospitals, and clinics, as 23    well as high-risk areas identified by the community water 24    supply;25        (9) a map of the areas where lead service lines are 26    expected to be found and the sequence with which those   SB4025 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    areas will be inventoried and lead service lines replaced;2        (10) measures for how the community water supply will 3    inform the public of the plan and provide opportunity for 4    public comment; and5        (11) measures to encourage diversity in hiring in the 6    workforce required to implement the plan as identified 7    under subsection (n). 8    (r) The Agency shall review final plans submitted to it 9under subsection (p). The Agency shall approve a final plan if 10the final plan includes all of the elements set forth under 11subsection (q) and the Agency determines that:12        (1) the proposed lead service line replacement 13    schedule set forth in the plan aligns with the timeline 14    requirements set forth under subsection (v);15        (2) the plan prioritizes the replacement of lead 16    service lines that provide water service to high-risk 17    facilities, such as preschools, day care centers, day care 18    homes, group day care homes, parks, playgrounds, 19    hospitals, and clinics, and high-risk areas identified by 20    the community water supply;21        (3) the plan includes analysis of cost and financing 22    options; and23        (4) the plan provides documentation of public review. 24    (s) An owner or operator of a community water supply has no 25duty to include in the plans required under subsection (p) 26information about service lines that are physically   SB4025 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1disconnected from a water main in its distribution system.2    (t) If a community water supply does not deliver a 3complete plan to the Agency by April 15, 2027, the community 4water supply may apply to the Agency for an extension no less 5than 3 months prior to the due date. The Agency shall develop 6criteria for granting plan extensions. When considering 7requests for extension, the Agency shall, at a minimum, 8consider: 9        (1) the number of service connections in a water 10    supply; and11        (2) the number of service lines of an unknown material 12    composition.13    (t-5) After the Agency has approved the final replacement 14plan described in subsection (p), the owner or operator of a 15community water supply shall submit a report detailing 16progress toward plan goals to the Agency for its review. The 17report shall be submitted annually for the first 10 years, and 18every 3 years thereafter until all lead service lines have 19been replaced. Reports under this subsection shall be 20published in the same manner described in subsection (l). The 21report shall include at least the following information as it 22pertains to the preceding reporting period:23        (1) The number of lead service lines replaced and the 24    average cost of lead service line replacement.25        (2) Progress toward meeting hiring requirements as 26    described in subsection (n) and subsection (o).  SB4025 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        (3) The percent of customers electing a waiver 2    offered, as described in subsections (ii) and (jj), among 3    those customers receiving a request or notification to 4    perform a lead service line replacement.5        (4) The method or methods used by the community water 6    supply to finance lead service line replacement.7    (u) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order 8to provide for costs associated with lead service line 9remediation and replacement, the corporate authorities of a 10municipality may, by ordinance or resolution by the corporate 11authorities, exercise authority provided in Section 27-5 et 12seq. of the Property Tax Code and Sections 8-3-1, 8-11-1, 138-11-5, 8-11-6, 9-1-1 et seq., 9-3-1 et seq., 9-4-1 et seq., 1411-131-1, and 11-150-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code. Taxes 15levied for this purpose shall be in addition to taxes for 16general purposes authorized under Section 8-3-1 of the 17Illinois Municipal Code and shall be included in the taxing 18district's aggregate extension for the purposes of Division 5 19of Article 18 of the Property Tax Code.20    (v) Every owner or operator of a community water supply 21shall replace all known lead service lines, subject to the 22requirements of subsection (ff), according to the following 23replacement rates and timelines to be calculated from the date 24of submission of the final replacement plan to the Agency: 25        (1) A community water supply reporting 1,200 or fewer 26    lead service lines in its final inventory and replacement   SB4025 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    plan shall replace all lead service lines, at an annual 2    rate of no less than 7% of the amount described in the 3    final inventory, with a timeline of up to 15 years for 4    completion.5        (2) A community water supply reporting more than 1,200 6    but fewer than 5,000 lead service lines in its final 7    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 8    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 6% of the 9    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 10    of up to 17 years for completion.11        (3) A community water supply reporting more than 4,999 12    but fewer than 10,000 lead service lines in its final 13    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 14    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 5% of the 15    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 16    of up to 20 years for completion.17        (4) A community water supply reporting more than 9,999 18    but fewer than 99,999 lead service lines in its final 19    inventory and replacement plan shall replace all lead 20    service lines, at an annual rate of no less than 3% of the 21    amount described in the final inventory, with a timeline 22    of up to 34 years for completion.23        (5) A community water supply reporting more than 24    99,999 lead service lines in its final inventory and 25    replacement plan shall replace all lead service lines, at 26    an annual rate of no less than 2% of the amount described   SB4025 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    in the final inventory, with a timeline of up to 50 years 2    for completion.3    (w) A community water supply may apply to the Agency for an 4extension to the replacement timelines described in paragraphs 5(1) through (5) of subsection (v). The Agency shall develop 6criteria for granting replacement timeline extensions. When 7considering requests for timeline extensions, the Agency 8shall, at a minimum, consider: 9        (1) the number of service connections in a water 10    supply; and11        (2) unusual circumstances creating hardship for a 12    community.13    The Agency may grant one extension of additional time 14equal to not more than 20% of the original replacement 15timeline, except in situations of extreme hardship in which 16the Agency may consider a second additional extension equal to 17not more than 10% of the original replacement timeline.18    Replacement rates and timelines shall be calculated from 19the date of submission of the final plan to the Agency.20    (x) The Lead Service Line Replacement Advisory Board is 21created within the Agency. The Advisory Board shall convene 22within 120 days after January 1, 2022 (the effective date of 23Public Act 102-613). 24    The Advisory Board shall consist of at least 28 voting 25members, as follows:26        (1) the Director of the Agency, or his or her   SB4025 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    designee, who shall serve as chairperson;2        (2) the Director of Revenue, or his or her designee;3        (3) the Director of Public Health, or his or her 4    designee;5        (4) fifteen members appointed by the Agency as 6    follows: 7            (A) one member representing a statewide 8        organization of municipalities as authorized by 9        Section 1-8-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code;10            (B) two members who are mayors representing 11        municipalities located in any county south of the 12        southernmost county represented by one of the 10 13        largest municipalities in Illinois by population, or 14        their respective designees;15            (C) two members who are representatives from 16        public health advocacy groups;17            (D) two members who are representatives from 18        publicly owned water utilities;19            (E) one member who is a representative from a 20        public utility as defined under Section 3-105 of the 21        Public Utilities Act that provides water service in 22        the State of Illinois;23            (F) one member who is a research professional 24        employed at an Illinois academic institution and 25        specializing in water infrastructure research;26            (G) two members who are representatives from   SB4025 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        nonprofit civic organizations;2            (H) one member who is a representative from a 3        statewide organization representing environmental 4        organizations;5            (I) two members who are representatives from 6        organized labor; and7            (J) one member representing an environmental 8        justice organization; and 9        (5) ten members who are the mayors of the 10 largest 10    municipalities in Illinois by population, or their 11    respective designees. 12    No less than 10 of the 28 voting members shall be persons 13of color, and no less than 3 shall represent communities 14defined or self-identified as environmental justice 15communities.16    Advisory Board members shall serve without compensation, 17but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the 18performance of their duties from funds appropriated for that 19purpose. The Agency shall provide administrative support to 20the Advisory Board.21    The Advisory Board shall meet no less than once every 6 22months.23    (y) The Advisory Board shall have, at a minimum, the 24following duties:25        (1) advising the Agency on best practices in lead 26    service line replacement;  SB4025 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        (2) reviewing the progress of community water supplies 2    toward lead service line replacement goals;3        (3) advising the Agency on other matters related to 4    the administration of the provisions of this Section;5        (4) advising the Agency on the integration of existing 6    lead service line replacement plans with any statewide 7    plan; and8        (5) providing technical support and practical 9    expertise in general. 10    (z) Within 18 months after January 1, 2022 (the effective 11date of Public Act 102-613), the Advisory Board shall deliver 12a report of its recommendations to the Governor and the 13General Assembly concerning opportunities for dedicated, 14long-term revenue options for funding lead service line 15replacement. In submitting recommendations, the Advisory Board 16shall consider, at a minimum, the following: 17        (1) the sufficiency of various revenue sources to 18    adequately fund replacement of all lead service lines in 19    Illinois;20        (2) the financial burden, if any, on households 21    falling below 150% of the federal poverty limit;22        (3) revenue options that guarantee low-income 23    households are protected from rate increases;24        (4) an assessment of the ability of community water 25    supplies to assess and collect revenue;26        (5) variations in financial resources among individual   SB4025 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    households within a service area; and2        (6) the protection of low-income households from rate 3    increases. 4    (aa) Within 10 years after January 1, 2022 (the effective 5date of Public Act 102-613), the Advisory Board shall prepare 6and deliver a report to the Governor and General Assembly 7concerning the status of all lead service line replacement 8within the State.9    (bb) The Lead Service Line Replacement Fund is created as 10a special fund in the State treasury to be used by the Agency 11for the purposes provided under this Section. The Fund shall 12be used exclusively to finance and administer programs and 13activities specified under this Section and listed under this 14subsection.15    The objective of the Fund is to finance activities 16associated with identifying and replacing lead service lines, 17build Agency capacity to oversee the provisions of this 18Section, and provide related assistance for the activities 19listed under this subsection.20    The Agency shall be responsible for the administration of 21the Fund and shall allocate moneys on the basis of priorities 22established by the Agency through administrative rule. On July 231, 2022 and on July 1 of each year thereafter, the Agency shall 24determine the available amount of resources in the Fund that 25can be allocated to the activities identified under this 26Section and shall allocate the moneys accordingly.  SB4025 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Lead 2Service Line Replacement Fund is not subject to sweeps, 3administrative charge-backs, or any other fiscal maneuver that 4would in any way transfer any amounts from the Lead Service 5Line Replacement Fund into any other fund of the State.6    (cc) Within one year after January 1, 2022 (the effective 7date of Public Act 102-613), the Agency shall design rules for 8a program for the purpose of administering lead service line 9replacement funds. The rules must, at minimum, contain:10        (1) the process by which community water supplies may 11    apply for funding; and12        (2) the criteria for determining unit of local 13    government eligibility and prioritization for funding, 14    including the prevalence of low-income households, as 15    measured by median household income, the prevalence of 16    lead service lines, and the prevalence of water samples 17    that demonstrate elevated levels of lead.18    (dd) Funding under subsection (cc) shall be available for 19costs directly attributable to the planning, design, or 20construction directly related to the replacement of lead 21service lines and restoration of property.22    Funding shall not be used for the general operating 23expenses of a municipality or community water supply. 24    (ee) An owner or operator of any community water supply 25receiving grant funding under subsection (cc) shall bear the 26entire expense of full lead service line replacement for all   SB4025 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1lead service lines in the scope of the grant. 2    (ff) When replacing a lead service line, the owner or 3operator of the community water supply shall replace the 4service line in its entirety, including, but not limited to, 5any portion of the service line (i) running on private 6property and (ii) within the building's plumbing at the first 7shut-off valve. Partial lead service line replacements are 8expressly prohibited. Exceptions shall be made under the 9following circumstances: 10        (1) In the event of an emergency repair that affects a 11    lead service line or a suspected lead service line, a 12    community water supply must contact the building owner to 13    begin the process of replacing the entire service line. If 14    the building owner is not able to be contacted or the 15    building owner or occupant refuses to grant access and 16    permission to replace the entire service line at the time 17    of the emergency repair, then the community water supply 18    may perform a partial lead service line replacement. Where 19    an emergency repair on a service line constructed of lead 20    or galvanized steel pipe results in a partial service line 21    replacement, the water supply responsible for commencing 22    the repair shall perform the following: 23            (A) Notify the building's owner or operator and 24        the resident or residents served by the lead service 25        line in writing that a repair has been completed. The 26        notification shall include, at a minimum:  SB4025 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1                (i) a warning that the work may result in 2            sediment, possibly containing lead, in the 3            building's water supply system;4                (ii) information concerning practices for 5            preventing the consumption of any lead in drinking 6            water, including a recommendation to flush water 7            distribution pipe during and after the completion 8            of the repair or replacement work and to clean 9            faucet aerator screens; and10                (iii) information regarding the dangers of 11            lead to young children and pregnant women. 12            (B) Provide filters for at least one fixture 13        supplying potable water for consumption. The filter 14        must be certified by an accredited third-party 15        certification body to NSF/ANSI 53 and NSF/ANSI 42 for 16        the reduction of lead and particulate. The filter must 17        be provided until such time that the remaining 18        portions of the service line have been replaced with a 19        material approved by the Department or a waiver has 20        been issued under subsection (ii).21            (C) Replace the remaining portion of the lead 22        service line within 30 days of the repair, or 120 days 23        in the event of weather or other circumstances beyond 24        reasonable control that prohibits construction. If a 25        complete lead service line replacement cannot be made 26        within the required period, the community water supply   SB4025 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1        responsible for commencing the repair shall notify the 2        Department in writing, at a minimum, of the following 3        within 24 hours of the repair: 4                (i) an explanation of why it is not feasible 5            to replace the remaining portion of the lead 6            service line within the allotted time; and7                (ii) a timeline for when the remaining portion 8            of the lead service line will be replaced. 9            (D) If complete repair of a lead service line 10        cannot be completed due to denial by the property 11        owner, the community water supply commencing the 12        repair shall request the affected property owner to 13        sign a waiver developed by the Department. If a 14        property owner of a nonresidential building or 15        residence operating as rental properties denies a 16        complete lead service line replacement, the property 17        owner shall be responsible for installing and 18        maintaining point-of-use filters certified by an 19        accredited third-party certification body to NSF/ANSI 20        53 and NSF/ANSI 42 for the reduction of lead and 21        particulate at all fixtures intended to supply water 22        for the purposes of drinking, food preparation, or 23        making baby formula. The filters shall continue to be 24        supplied by the property owner until such time that 25        the property owner has affected the remaining portions 26        of the lead service line to be replaced.  SB4025 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1            (E) Document any remaining lead service line, 2        including a portion on the private side of the 3        property, in the community water supply's distribution 4        system materials inventory required under subsection 5        (d). 6        For the purposes of this paragraph (1), written notice 7    shall be provided in the method and according to the 8    provisions of subsection (jj).9        (2) Lead service lines that are physically 10    disconnected from the distribution system are exempt from 11    this subsection. 12    (gg) Except as provided in subsection (hh), on and after 13January 1, 2022, when the owner or operator of a community 14water supply replaces a water main, the community water supply 15shall identify all lead service lines connected to the water 16main and shall replace the lead service lines by:17        (1) identifying the material or materials of each lead 18    service line connected to the water main, including, but 19    not limited to, any portion of the service line (i) 20    running on private property and (ii) within the building 21    plumbing at the first shut-off valve or 18 inches inside 22    the building, whichever is shorter;23        (2) in conjunction with replacement of the water main, 24    replacing any and all portions of each lead service line 25    connected to the water main that are composed of lead; and26        (3) if a property owner or customer refuses to grant   SB4025 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    access to the property, following prescribed notice 2    provisions as outlined in subsection (ff). 3    If an owner of a potentially affected building intends to 4replace a portion of a lead service line or a galvanized 5service line and the galvanized service line is or was 6connected downstream to lead piping, then the owner of the 7potentially affected building shall provide the owner or 8operator of the community water supply with notice at least 45 9days before commencing the work. In the case of an emergency 10repair, the owner of the potentially affected building must 11provide filters for each kitchen area that are certified by an 12accredited third-party certification body to NSF/ANSI 53 and 13NSF/ANSI 42 for the reduction of lead and particulate. If the 14owner of the potentially affected building notifies the owner 15or operator of the community water supply that replacement of 16a portion of the lead service line after the emergency repair 17is completed, then the owner or operator of the community 18water supply shall replace the remainder of the lead service 19line within 30 days after completion of the emergency repair. 20A community water supply may take up to 120 days if necessary 21due to weather conditions. If a replacement takes longer than 2230 days, filters provided by the owner of the potentially 23affected building must be replaced in accordance with the 24manufacturer's recommendations. Partial lead service line 25replacements by the owners of potentially affected buildings 26are otherwise prohibited.  SB4025 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1    (hh) For municipalities with a population in excess of 21,000,000 inhabitants, the requirements of subsection (gg) 3shall commence on January 1, 2023. 4    (ii) At least 45 days before conducting planned lead 5service line replacement, the owner or operator of a community 6water supply shall, by mail, attempt to contact the owner of 7the potentially affected building serviced by the lead service 8line to request access to the building and permission to 9replace the lead service line in accordance with the lead 10service line replacement plan. If the owner of the potentially 11affected building does not respond to the request within 15 12days after the request is sent, the owner or operator of the 13community water supply shall attempt to post the request on 14the entrance of the potentially affected building. 15    If the owner or operator of a community water supply is 16unable to obtain approval to access and replace a lead service 17line, the owner or operator of the community water supply 18shall request that the owner of the potentially affected 19building sign a waiver. The waiver shall be developed by the 20Department and should be made available in the owner's 21language. If the owner of the potentially affected building 22refuses to sign the waiver or fails to respond to the community 23water supply after the community water supply has complied 24with this subsection, then the community water supply shall 25notify the Department in writing within 15 working days. 26    (jj) When replacing a lead service line or repairing or   SB4025 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1replacing water mains with lead service lines or partial lead 2service lines attached to them, the owner or operator of a 3community water supply shall provide the owner of each 4potentially affected building that is serviced by the affected 5lead service lines or partial lead service lines, as well as 6the occupants of those buildings, with an individual written 7notice. The notice shall be delivered by mail or posted at the 8primary entranceway of the building. The notice must, in 9addition, be electronically mailed where an electronic mailing 10address is known or can be reasonably obtained. Written notice 11shall include, at a minimum, the following: 12        (1) a warning that the work may result in sediment, 13    possibly containing lead from the service line, in the 14    building's water;15        (2) information concerning the best practices for 16    preventing exposure to or risk of consumption of lead in 17    drinking water, including a recommendation to flush water 18    lines during and after the completion of the repair or 19    replacement work and to clean faucet aerator screens; and20        (3) information regarding the dangers of lead exposure 21    to young children and pregnant women. 22    When the individual written notice described in the first 23paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 24planned work other than the repair or replacement of a water 25meter, the owner or operator of the community water supply 26shall provide the notice not less than 14 days before work   SB4025 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1begins. When the individual written notice described in the 2first paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 3emergency repairs other than the repair or replacement of a 4water meter, the owner or operator of the community water 5supply shall provide the notice at the time the work is 6initiated. When the individual written notice described in the 7first paragraph of this subsection is required as a result of 8the repair or replacement of a water meter, the owner or 9operator of the community water supply shall provide the 10notice at the time the work is initiated. 11    The notifications required under this subsection must 12contain the following statement in Spanish, Polish, Chinese, 13Tagalog, Arabic, Korean, German, Urdu, and Gujarati: "This 14notice contains important information about your water service 15and may affect your rights. We encourage you to have this 16notice translated in full into a language you understand and 17before you make any decisions that may be required under this 18notice."19    An owner or operator of a community water supply that is 20required under this subsection to provide an individual 21written notice to the owner and occupant of a potentially 22affected building that is a multi-dwelling building may 23satisfy that requirement and the requirements of this 24subsection regarding notification to non-English speaking 25customers by posting the required notice on the primary 26entranceway of the building and at the location where the   SB4025 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1occupant's mail is delivered as reasonably as possible. 2    When this subsection would require the owner or operator 3of a community water supply to provide an individual written 4notice to the entire community served by the community water 5supply or would require the owner or operator of a community 6water supply to provide individual written notices as a result 7of emergency repairs or when the community water supply that 8is required to comply with this subsection is a small system, 9the owner or operator of the community water supply may 10provide the required notice through local media outlets, 11social media, or other similar means in lieu of providing the 12individual written notices otherwise required under this 13subsection. 14    No notifications are required under this subsection for 15work performed on water mains that are used to transmit 16treated water between community water supplies and properties 17that have no service connections. 18    (kk) No community water supply that sells water to any 19wholesale or retail consecutive community water supply may 20pass on any costs associated with compliance with this Section 21to consecutive systems.22    (ll) To the extent allowed by law, when a community water 23supply replaces or installs a lead service line in a public 24right-of-way or enters into an agreement with a private 25contractor for replacement or installation of a lead service 26line, the community water supply shall be held harmless for   SB4025 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1all damage to property when replacing or installing the lead 2service line. If dangers are encountered that prevent the 3replacement of the lead service line, the community water 4supply shall notify the Department within 15 working days of 5why the replacement of the lead service line could not be 6accomplished.7    (mm) The Agency may propose to the Board, and the Board may 8adopt, any rules necessary to implement and administer this 9Section. The Department may adopt rules necessary to address 10lead service lines attached to non-community water supplies.11    (nn) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section, 12no requirement in this Section shall be construed as being 13less stringent than existing applicable federal requirements.14    (oo) All lead service line replacements financed in whole 15or in part with funds obtained under this Section shall be 16considered public works for purposes of the Prevailing Wage 17Act. 18    (pp) Beginning in 2023, each municipality with a 19population of more than 1,000,000 inhabitants shall publicly 20post on its website data describing progress the municipality 21has made toward replacing lead service lines within the 22municipality. The data required to be posted under this 23subsection shall be the same information required to be 24reported under paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (t-5) 25of this Section. Beginning in 2024, each municipality that is 26subject to this subsection shall annually update the data   SB4025 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1posted on its website under this subsection. A municipality's 2duty to post data under this subsection terminates only when 3all lead service lines within the municipality have been 4replaced. Nothing in this subsection (pp) shall be construed 5to replace, undermine, conflict with, or otherwise amend the 6responsibilities and requirements set forth in subsection 7(t-5) of this Section.8    (qq) The owner of a private property must allow the 9community water supply access to the property to replace, on 10the private side of the property, the lead service line or the 11galvanized requiring replacement service line if the community 12water supply is offering such a replacement at no cost to the 13property owner. If the owner of the private property is 14unavailable or unwilling to provide consent to replace the 15lead service line or the galvanized requiring replacement 16service line, any legal occupant of the private property where 17the service line is located may provide consent for access to 18the community water supply or the community water supply's 19contractor. Any legal occupant may complete forms for access 20to replace the lead service line or the galvanized requiring 21replacement service line. The legal occupant shall be held 22harmless for providing access, completing forms, or for the 23completion of replacements of the lead service line or the 24galvanized requiring replacement service line. The community 25water supply may use any available legal options and remedies 26to enforce this subsection.   SB4025 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20763 TRT 34267 b1(Source: P.A. 102-613, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 2103-167, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.